District of Columbia statutes.
3-344

Penalty for violation of subchapter.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter shall upon conviction be fined not more than $300.

Nov. 3, 1977, D.C. Law 2-37, § 5, 24 DCR 4058
Licensure, non-health related occupations and professions, excepted occupations, see § 47-2853.04.
1981 Ed., § 2-344.
1973 Ed., § 2-1744.
See note to § 2-341.

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.